src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VTA_CNJ_3C_PRE_DUB_OR_PRT_DUB_PCP_SET  
@P.3Num.Pl@ VTA_CNJ_DUB_OR_PRT_DUB ; 

LEXICON VTA_CNJ_DUB_AND_END
!+Dub:en2    # ; !Medler
+Dub:enh    # ;

LEXICON VTA_CNJ_DUB_OR_PRT_DUB
!+Dub:en2           VTA_CNJ_PCP_GET ; !Medler
!+Prt+Dub:b1an2en2  VTA_CNJ_PCP_GET  ; !Medler
+Dub:eny1           VTA_CNJ_PCP_GET ;
+Prt+Dub:%>b1an2eny1  VTA_CNJ_PCP_GET  ;

!{participles (redundant with vai pcp, nominal periph slot)
LEXICON VTA_CNJ_PCP_GET
@R.Ccnj@@R.3Num.Pl@     VTA_CNJ_PCP_PL ;
@R.Ccnj@@R.3Num.Obv@    VTA_CNJ_PCP_OBV ;
@R.Ccnj@@R.3Num.InanPl@ VTA_CNJ_PCP_INAN_PL ;
                # ;

LEXICON VTA_CNJ_PCP_PL
+Pcp+3Pl:%>ig # ;

LEXICON VTA_CNJ_PCP_OBV
+Pcp+3Obv:%>in # ;

LEXICON VTA_CNJ_PCP_INAN_PL
+Pcp+%0Pl:%>in # ;
!}vta cnj compressed end
!} cnj end

!{ imp order
LEXICON VTA_IMPER
+1+2:i2shin # ; !p 304 reports optional palatalization
+1Pl+2:i2shinaang # ; !first inclusive, disambiguate from 2 v 1pl ...
+1Pl+2Pl:i2shinaang # ; !ambig between 2pl v 1pl and 2sg v 1pl
+1+2Pl:i2shik # ;
+3+2:i2 # ; !p 304 only reports pal for this slot, but I extended to others. Piggott 1980:197 indicates extending it is a mistake
+3+2:in # ;
!+3Pl+2:i2 # ; !I kept i2 here since it looks so similar to +3+2 !2 v 3 is systematically ambiguous for 3/3pl in imperatives (VAIO is ambiguous for 2p v 3/3p as well), VTA delayed imperatives are not ambiguous for 2p v 3/3p
!+3Pl+2:in # ; !2 v 3 is systematically ambiguous for 3/3pl in imperatives (VAIO is ambiguous for 2p v 3/3p as well), VTA delayed imperatives are not ambiguous for 2p v 3/3p
+3+21Pl:aadaa # ;
+3Pl+21Pl:%>miinaadaanik # ;
+3+2Pl:ik # ;  !Piggott 1980:197 explicitly states that this neither conditions palatalization nor triggers awi->aa/oo
+3Pl+2Pl:ik # ; !Piggott 1980:197 explicitly states that this neither conditions palatalization nor triggers awi->aa/oo
!+Imm+2+1:i2shin # ; !p 304 reports optional palatalization
!+Imm+2+1Pl:i2shinaang # ; !first inclusive, disambiguate from 2 v 1pl ...
!+Imm+2Pl+1Pl:i2shinaang # ; !ambig between 2pl v 1pl and 2sg v 1pl
!+Imm+2Pl+1:i2shik # ;
!+Imm+2+3:i2 # ; !p 304 only reports pal for this slot, but I extended to others
!+Imm+2+3:i2n # ;
!+Imm+2+3Pl:i2 # ;
!+Imm+2+3Pl:i2n # ;
!+Imm+2+1Pl+3:aadaa # ;
!+Imm+2+1Pl+3Pl:%>miinaadaanik # ;
!+Imm+2Pl+3:i2k # ;
!+Imm+2Pl+3Pl:i2k # ;

+Del+1+2:i2shikan # ;
!+Del+21Pl:0 # ; !unknown first inclusive, disambiguate from 2 v 1pl ...
!+Del+2Pl+1Pl:0 # ;
+Del+1+2Pl:i2shiikek # ;
+Del+3+2:aakan # ;
!+Del+3Pl+2:aakan # ; !2 v 3 is systematically ambiguous for 3/3pl in imperatives (VAIO is ambiguous for 2p v 3/3p as well), VTA delayed imperatives are not ambiguous for 2p v 3/3p
!+Del+21Pl+3:0 # ;
!+Del+21Pl+3Pl:0 # ;
+Del+3+2Pl:aakek # ;
+Del+3Pl+2Pl:%>miinaakek # ;

+Neg+1+2:i2shiken2 # ;
!+Neg+21Pl:0 # ; !unknown first inclusive, disambiguate from 2 v 1pl ...
!+Neg+2Pl+1Pl:0 # ;
+Neg+1+2Pl:i2shikego # ;
+Neg+3+2:aaken2 # ;
!+Neg+3Pl+2:aaken2 # ;!2 v 3 is systematically ambiguous for 3/3pl in imperatives (VAIO is ambiguous for 2p v 3/3p as well), VTA delayed imperatives are not ambiguous for 2p v 3/3p
+Neg+3+21Pl:aasiidaa # ;
+Neg+3Pl+21Pl:aasiidaanig # ;
!+Neg+2Pl+3:0 # ;
!+Neg+2Pl+3Pl:0 # ;

!} imp end
!} VTA end

!{ VTI 
LEXICON VTI_ORDERS_GET
@D.Order.Cnj@ VTI_INDEP_NEG ; 
@D.Person@    VTI_NON_INDEP_GET ;

LEXICON VTI_NON_INDEP_GET 
+Cnj:c1   VTI_CNJ_NEG ; !c1 handles stem-suffix specific adjustments
@D.Order.Cnj@ VTI_IMPER_TAG ;

LEXICON VTI_IMPER_TAG
+Imp:0    VTI_IMPER ;

!{ Independent order 

LEXICON VTI_INDEP_NEG 
+Neg:sii    VTI_INDEP_PERS_GET ; !zii after nasal
            VTI_INDEP_PERS_GET ;

!{Number slot 
LEXICON VTI_INDEP_PERS_GET
@R.Person@  VTI_INDEP_NUM ;
@D.Person@  VTI_INDEP_OBV ;

LEXICON VTI_INDEP_OBV
+3Obv:iniw           VTI_INDEP_PRE_MODE ; !out on limb by allowing continuation
+3Obv+Prt+Dub:inigoban2  # ; 
                        !inan pl number tricky here, because never indexed in conjunct/conjunct derived forms

LEXICON VTI_INDEP_NUM
0:n           VTI_INDEP_PRE_MODE ; !multiple analyses possible here: non-plural actor, or inanimate goal. Originally had +%0, but the info was redundant with VTI and could not be used in interpretation because it isn't always present, so opted to just not write it
@D.Person.3@    VTI_INDEP_1_OR_2_NUM ;
@D.Person.1@    VTI_INDEP_3_OR_2_NUM ;
@R.Person.3@    VTI_INDEP_PRT_DUB ;
!passive unknown

LEXICON VTI_INDEP_1_OR_2_NUM
+1Pl:naan2y1    VTI_INDEP_PRE_PERIPH ; !naan unattested w/ mode, but may end word
+1Pl:min2       VTI_INDEP_PRE_MODE ; !21pl assumed to be compatible with this too

LEXICON VTI_INDEP_3_OR_2_NUM
+2Pl:naawaa    VTI_INDEP_2PL_PRE_MODE ; !3pl doesn't have dedicated morpheme, rides on 2pl
!} Num end

!{Mode slot 
LEXICON VTI_INDEP_PRE_MODE
0:aa    VTI_INDEP_MODE ;
        VTI_INDEP_PERIPH ;
        # ;         

LEXICON VTI_INDEP_2PL_PRE_MODE
        VTI_INDEP_MODE ;
        VTI_INDEP_PERIPH ;
        # ;         

LEXICON VTI_INDEP_MODE
+Dub:dig    VTI_INDEP_DUB_PRE_PERIPH ; 
+Prt:ban2i1  VTI_INDEP_PRT_PRE_PERIPH ; 

LEXICON VTI_INDEP_DUB_PRE_PERIPH 
0:en        VTI_INDEP_PERIPH ;
            # ;

LEXICON VTI_INDEP_PRT_PRE_PERIPH 
        VTI_INDEP_PERIPH ;
            # ;

!PrtDub restricted to third persons above
!no inanimate plural information possible (conjuncty suffixes never do)
LEXICON VTI_INDEP_PRT_DUB
+2Pl+Prt+Dub:%>gwaaban2 # ; !suspiciously non-prt-dub like g-2pl-ban
+Prt+Dub:%>goban2 # ;

!}Mode end

!might consider restricting plural morphology a little:
    !min (1pl) can't be directly followed by pl (though can be followed at distance)
    !ini (3obv) may never be followed by pl (hard to tell with sparse information)
LEXICON VTI_INDEP_PRE_PERIPH 
        VTI_INDEP_PERIPH  ;
        # ;

LEXICON VTI_INDEP_PERIPH
+%0Pl:%>an   # ;

!} indep end

!{Conjunct order (careful, this looks just like VAI, but differs in important ways) 
!{negative slot 
LEXICON VTI_CNJ_NEG 
+Neg:%>siiw3        VTI_CNJ_DUB_SET ; !must be followed by dub in vtis
+Neg:%>siw3         VTI_CNJ_PRT_SET ; !may only be followed by prt in vtis
                VTI_CNJ_PERSNUM ;
+Neg+3Pl:%>si%>gwaa  VTI_CNJ_IRREG_3PL_SUFFS ; !may be followed by prt in vtis

LEXICON VTI_CNJ_IRREG_3PL_SUFFS 
    # ;
    VTI_CNJ_PRT ;

LEXICON VTI_CNJ_DUB_SET 
@P.Mode.Dub@    VTI_CNJ_PERSNUM ; 

LEXICON VTI_CNJ_PRT_SET 
@P.Mode.Prt@    VTI_CNJ_PERSNUM ; 
!}

!{ persnum 

LEXICON VTI_CNJ_PERSNUM
    VTI_CNJ_3 ;
    VTI_CNJ_3PL_MODE_GET ;
    VTI_CNJ_DUB_EARLY_A ;

LEXICON VTI_CNJ_DUB_EARLY_A
0:w4    VTI_CNJ_DUB_SET_A ;
        VTI_CNJ_NOT_3 ;

LEXICON VTI_CNJ_DUB_SET_A
!@P.Mode.Dub@    VTI_CNJ_NOT_3 ;
@U.Mode.Dub@    VTI_CNJ_NOT_3 ; !U won't overwrite prior Prt, Prt fails instead

LEXICON VTI_CNJ_NOT_3
+1:%>aan       VTI_CNJ_PRT_1 ; !breaking morpheme over continuation lexica. have pret cnj "b" trigger assimilation, sometimes nasalize V
+2:%>an        VTI_CNJ_MODE_GET ; !ditto re assimilation: are there cases were nas-obs isn't modified to be homorganic?
+1Pl:%>aang      VTI_CNJ_MODE_GET ;
+21Pl:%>ang         VTI_CNJ_MODE_GET ; !VTI never shows w/o for mode suffs
+2Pl:%>eg       VTI_CNJ_MODE_GET ; !VTI only shows w for DUB, not PRT DUB
@R.Mode.Dub@    VTI_CNJ_DUB_UNSPEC_ACT ; !irregular realization for unspec act dub

LEXICON VTI_CNJ_DUB_UNSPEC_ACT
+X:%>iing       VTI_CNJ_MODE_GET ;

LEXICON VTI_CNJ_3PL_MODE_GET
@D.Mode.Prt@ VTI_CNJ_3PL ; !neg morpheme siw sets prt as legal follower, but 3pl neg prt doesn't use siw 
            VTI_CNJ_3 ;

LEXICON VTI_CNJ_3PL
+3Pl:w4aad1       VTI_CNJ_DUB_EARLY_B ; !Irregularity when negated and this is last morpheme/followed by prt

LEXICON VTI_CNJ_3PL_GATEWAY 
0:y1        VTI_CNJ_PCP_PL  ;
@P.3Num.Pl@ VTI_CNJ_DUB_EARLY_B ; 


LEXICON VTI_CNJ_3 
+3:%>d1               VTI_CNJ_3PL_GATEWAY ; !d1 phon in root.lexc
+3Obv:%>nid1           VTI_CNJ_3OBV_GATEWAY ; !nas morph inid?
+X:%>nd1              VTI_CNJ_MODE_GET ; !nd1b -> ngib, this realization only compatible with prt, not dub

LEXICON VTI_CNJ_3OBV_GATEWAY 
0:y1        VTI_CNJ_PCP_OBV ;
@P.3Num.Obv@ VTI_CNJ_DUB_EARLY_B ; 

LEXICON VTI_CNJ_DUB_EARLY_B !letters or numbers for ordered? 
0:w4    VTI_CNJ_DUB_SET_B ;
        VTI_CNJ_MODE_GET ;

LEXICON VTI_CNJ_DUB_SET_B
@U.Mode.Dub@    VTI_CNJ_MODE_GET ; !U won't overwrite prior Prt

!} persnum end

!{preterite slot 
!{first person prt 
LEXICON VTI_CNJ_PRT_1
+Prt:%>b1aan2   VTI_CNJ_DUB_GET_1 ; !Medler could delete this n
@R.Ccnj@        VTI_CNJ_PCP_INAN_PL_GATEWAY ;
@D.Mode@    VTI_CNJ_1_END ; 
@R.Mode.Prt@ VTI_CNJ_1_END ; 
@R.Mode.Dub@    VTI_CNJ_DUB ;

LEXICON VTI_CNJ_DUB_GET_1
@D.Mode.Dub@    VTI_CNJ_1_END ;
@R.Mode.Dub@    VTI_CNJ_DUB ;

LEXICON VTI_CNJ_1_END
!            # ; !Medler didn't nasalize
0:h         # ; !left over morpheme chunk ... first person aan turns to aanh, pret turns to baanh
!} first person prt end

LEXICON VTI_CNJ_MODE_GET
            VTI_CNJ_PRT ;
@R.Ccnj@    VTI_CNJ_PCP_INAN_PL_GATEWAY ; 
@D.Mode.Dub@    # ; !may end if Dub wasn't set earlier 

LEXICON VTI_CNJ_PRT 
+Prt:%>b1an2   VTI_CNJ_DUB_GET ; !i1 included for participles later to avoid prtdub morpheme boundary triggering ii,
@R.Mode.Dub@    VTI_CNJ_DUB ;
!@D.Mode@    VTI_CNJ_DUB_GET ;
!@R.Mode@    VTI_CNJ_DUB ; !otherwise, you can end, or pick up +Dub
!unclear why commented out section here behaved differently from  VTI_CNJ_PRT_1

LEXICON VTI_CNJ_DUB_GET
@D.Mode.Dub@    VTI_CNJ_PRT_I1 ;
@R.Mode.Dub@    VTI_CNJ_DUB ;

LEXICON VTI_CNJ_PRT_I1
0:i1        VTI_CNJ_PCP_GET ;
!} prt end

!{dubitative slot
LEXICON VTI_CNJ_DUB 
+Dub:%>en2 VTI_CNJ_PCP_GET ;
!} dub end

!{Participles
LEXICON VTI_CNJ_PCP_GET
@R.Ccnj@@R.3Num.Pl@     VTI_CNJ_PCP_PL ;
@R.Ccnj@@R.3Num.Obv@    VTI_CNJ_PCP_OBV ; 
@R.Ccnj@                VTI_CNJ_PCP_INAN_PL ; 
                    # ; 

LEXICON VTI_CNJ_PCP_INAN_PL_GATEWAY
0:y1            VTI_CNJ_PCP_INAN_PL ; 

LEXICON VTI_CNJ_PCP_PL
+Pcp+3Pl:%>ag # ; 

LEXICON VTI_CNJ_PCP_OBV
+Pcp+3Obv:%>an # ; 

LEXICON VTI_CNJ_PCP_INAN_PL
+Pcp+%0Pl:%>an # ; 
!} participles end
!} Cnj end

!{ imperative
LEXICON VTI_IMPER 
+2:n4 # ; !no lengthening (amn -/> aan)
+2Pl:ok # ; !og optionally after vowels?
+21Pl+%0:daa # ;
+21Pl+%0Pl:daanin # ;
!+Imm+2:n4 # ; !no lengthening (amn -/> aan)
!+Imm+2Pl:ok # ; !og optionally after vowels?
!+Imm+21Pl+%0:daa # ;
!+Imm+21Pl+%0Pl:daanin # ;
+Del+2:%>kan # ; 
+Del+2Pl:%>keg # ; 
+Del+21Pl+%0:%>kang # ;
+Del+21Pl+%0Pl:%>kang # ;
+Neg+2:%>ken # ; !gen after nasals
+Neg+2Pl:%>kegon # ; !gegon after nasals
+Neg+21Pl+%0:siidaa # ; !ziidaa after nasals
+Neg+21Pl+%0Pl:siidaanin # ; !book gives suff daanin, exe waabndanziidaanin

!} imp end
!} VTI end
